Hawaii statutes.
§40-84 Petty cash funds; regulations.
Whenever the head of any state department, board, bureau, commission, or other
agency deems it necessary to have a petty cash fund for the proper transaction
of the business of the agency, a written application therefor shall be made to
the comptroller setting forth the details covering the purposes and uses of and
for the fund. The comptroller, before issuing a state warrant for that
purpose, shall determine whether or not the business of the agency warrants the
establishment of such a fund, and if the comptroller is satisfied that such a
fund is necessary, the comptroller shall issue a state warrant to such agency
for an amount as the comptroller shall determine, not to exceed the sum of
$100,000, except that this limitation of $100,000 shall not apply to the
University of Hawaii and the stadium authority.

The comptroller may prescribe such rules as the
comptroller may deem necessary for the proper administration and accountability
of these funds. [L 1941, c 137, §1; am L 1943, c 106, §1; RL 1945, §1567; RL
1955, §34-16; am L 1957, c 152, §1; HRS §40-84; am L 1969, c 100, §1; am L
1976, c 117, §1; am L 1981, c 70, §1; am L 1988, c 227, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next